Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5802
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Third-Party Administrator Act:

(1) Affiliate or affiliated shall mean any entity or person who, directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with a specified entity or person;

(2) Control shall have the same meaning as in section 44-2121;

(3) Director shall mean the Director of Insurance;

(4) Insurance or insurance coverage shall mean any coverage offered or provided by an insurer;

(5) Insurer shall mean any person undertaking to provide life insurance, sickness and accident insurance, workers' compensation insurance coverage, or annuities in this state. Insurer shall include an authorized insurance company, a prepaid hospital or medical care plan, a health maintenance organization, or any other person providing a plan of insurance subject to state insurance regulation. Insurer shall include an employer who is approved by the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court as a self-insurer. Insurer shall not include a bona fide employee benefit plan established by an employer or an employee organization, or both, for which the insurance laws of this state are preempted pursuant to the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as the act existed on September 1, 2001;

(6) Third-party administrator shall mean a person who directly or indirectly solicits or effects coverage of, underwrites, collects charges or premiums from, or adjusts or settles claims on residents of this state or residents of another state from offices in this state, in connection with life insurance, sickness and accident insurance, workers' compensation insurance coverage, or annuities, except any of the following:

(a) An employer on behalf of its employees or the employees of one or more subsidiaries or affiliated corporations of such employer;

(b) A union on behalf of its members;

(c) An insurer which is authorized to transact the business of insurance in this state with respect to a policy lawfully issued and delivered in and pursuant to the laws of this state or another state;

(d) An insurance producer licensed to sell life insurance, sickness and accident insurance, workers' compensation insurance coverage, or annuities in this state whose activities are limited exclusively to the sale of insurance;

(e) A creditor on behalf of its debtors with respect to insurance covering a debt between the creditor and its debtors;

(f) A trust and its trustees, agents, and employees acting pursuant to such trust established in conformity with 29 U.S.C. 186, as such section existed on September 1, 2001;

(g) A trust exempt from taxation under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01, its trustees and employees acting pursuant to such trust, or a custodian and the custodian's agents or employees acting pursuant to a custodian account which meets the requirements of section 401(f) of the Internal Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01;

(h) A credit union or a financial institution which is subject to supervision or examination by federal or state banking authorities or a mortgage lender, to the extent it collects and remits premiums to licensed insurance agents or authorized insurers in connection with loan payments;

(i) A credit card issuing company which advances for and collects premiums or charges from its credit card holders who have authorized collection if the company does not adjust or settle claims;

(j) A person who adjusts or settles claims in the normal course of that person's practice or employment as an attorney at law and who does not collect charges or premiums in connection with life insurance, sickness and accident insurance, workers' compensation insurance coverage, or annuities;

(k) A person who acts solely as a third-party administrator of one or more bona fide employee benefit plans established by an employer or an employee organization, or both, for which the insurance laws of this state are preempted pursuant to the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as the act existed on September 1, 2001; or

(l) A person licensed as a managing general agent in this state whose activities are limited exclusively to the scope of activities allowed under such license; and

(7) Underwrite or underwriting shall include, but not be limited to, the acceptance of employer or individual applications for insurance coverage of individuals in accordance with the written rules of the insurer, the overall planning and coordinating of an insurance program, and the ability to procure bonds and excess insurance.

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 77;

Laws 1995, LB 574, § 49;

Laws 2001, LB 51, § 39.